Vermont, session 2025-2026, S311.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 5201 is amended to read:
§ 5201. NOTICES; POSTING
(a)(1) An owner, or a person having the exclusive right to take game upon
land or the waters thereon, who desires to protect his or her the owner’s land or
private pond or propagation farm over which he or she the owner has exclusive
control may maintain notices stating that:
(A) the shooting, trapping, or taking of game or wild animals is
prohibited or is by permission only;
VT LEG #385489 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.311
2026 Page 2 of 3
(B) fishing or the taking of fish is prohibited or is by permission
only; or
(C) fishing, hunting, trapping, or taking of game is prohibited or is by
permission only.
(2) “Permission only signs” authorized under this section shall contain
the owner’s name and a method by which to contact the property owner or a
person authorized to provide permission to hunt, fish, or trap on the property.
(b) Notices prohibiting the taking of game shall be erected upon or near the
boundaries of lands to be affected with notices at each corner and not over 400
feet apart along the boundaries thereof. Legible signs must be maintained at
all times and shall be dated each year. These signs shall be of a standard size
and design as the Commissioner shall specify.
(c) The owner or person posting the lands shall record this posting annually
in the town clerk’s office of the town in which the land is located. The posting
shall be valid and enforceable for 365 days after the date the posting is
recorded. The recording form shall be furnished by the Commissioner and
shall be filled out in triplicate, one copy to be retained by the town clerk, one
copy to the Commissioner, and one copy to be retained by the person having
the right to post the lands. The forms shall contain the information as to the
approximate number of acres posted, location in town, date of posting, and
signature of person so posting the lands. The town clerk shall file the record,
VT LEG #385489 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.311
2026 Page 3 of 3
and it shall be open to public inspection. The town clerk shall retain a fee of
$5.00 for this recording.
(d) Land posted as provided in subsection (b) of this section shall be
enclosed land for the purposes herein.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385489 v.2